Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.520

Federal funds, private gifts or grants—Office to administer.

The office is authorized to receive and expend federal funds and any private gifts or grants, such federal funds or private funds to be expended in accordance with the conditions contingent in such grant thereof.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 109; 1985 c 370 s 22; 1975 1st ex.s. c 132 s 14. Prior: 1969 ex.s. c 263 s 5. Formerly RCW 28B.80.230, 28.90.140, 28B.81.050.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Effective date—Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 132: See notes following RCW 28B.77.060.